Hawaii statutes.
§125-6 Investigations, surveys. The
governor and the governor's authorized representative may make investigations
and surveys for the purpose of ascertaining facts to be used in administering
this chapter, and in making the investigations and surveys, may require the
making, filing, or keeping of applications, schedules, records, reports, or
statements, under oath or otherwise, administer oaths, take evidence under
oath, subpoena witnesses, and require the production of books, papers, and
records. Witnesses shall be allowed their fees and mileage as in cases in the
circuit courts. The circuit court of any circuit or judge thereof may enforce
by proper proceedings the attendance and testimony of any witness subpoenaed to
appear within the circuit, or the production of books, papers, and records. [L
Sp 1949, c 21, §6; RL 1955, §357-6; HRS §125-6; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next